Utah statutes.
13-16-13.   Confidentiality and use of information.

(1)  Any transfer price or posted rack price disclosed to the attorney general pursuant to Subsection 13-16-3(2), any records disclosed to the attorney general pursuant to Section 13-16-10, and any testimony, responses to interrogatories, documents or materials provided to the attorney general pursuant to a civil investigative demand shall be kept confidential by the attorney general unless confidentiality is waived in writing by the person who has:

(a)  provided the transfer price, posted rack price, or records; or

(b)  testified, answered interrogatories, provided documents or materials.

(2)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the attorney general may disclose any records, testimony, documents, materials, or other information obtained under this section, without either the consent of the person from whom it was received or the person being investigated, to:

(a)  any court; and

(b)  officers and employees of federal or state law enforcement agencies, provided the person from whom the information, documents, or objects were obtained is notified 20 days prior to disclosure, and the federal or state law enforcement agency certifies that the information will be:

(i)  maintained in confidence, as required by Subsection 13-16-13(1); and

(ii)  used only for official law enforcement purposes.

